Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4653.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 634b. Except as otherwise provided in section 634(2), the special election to fill a vacancy in the office of senator or representative in the state legislature must be held not less than 60 days after the governor calls for the special election, as provided in section 634(1), and not later than 180 days after the date the vacancy occurs. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4652 (request no. H03513'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.